Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Chapter 6

Tennessee Coordinate System

66-6-101. Designation of geodetic survey system.

The most recent system of plane coordinates which has been established by the United States Department of Commerce, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration's National Geodetic Survey, based on the National Spatial Reference System, and known as the State Plane Coordinate System, for defining and stating the geographic positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth within the State of Tennessee shall hereafter be known as the Tennessee State Plane Coordinate System.

The system of plane coordinates, known as the North American Datum of 1983, which has been established by the United States Department of Commerce, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration's National Geodetic Survey, formerly the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey, for defining and stating the geographic positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth within this state is hereafter to be known and designated as the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983.

The system of plane coordinates which was established in 1927 by the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey for defining and stating the positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth within this state is hereafter to be known and designated as the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1927.

For the purpose of the use of either system, this state has one (1) zone as defined by the National Geodetic Survey.

After December 31, 2022, the “Tennessee State Plane Coordinate System” is the sole system recognized and utilized in Tennessee for the purposes of this chapter. Any use prior to December 31, 2022, may continue to use the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1927 or the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983 in its applications relative to redistricting.

Acts 1991, ch. 42, § 2; 2019, ch. 213, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§66-6-101 —66-6-107 (Acts 1947, ch. 179, §§ 1-6); C. Supp. 1950, §§ 1034.17-1034.22 (Williams, §§ 630.35-630.40), T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-601 — 64-607), concerning the Tennessee system of coordinates, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 42, § 8.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote (a) and (b) which read: “(a) The system of plane coordinates, known as the North American Datum of 1983, which has been established by the national ocean survey/national geodetic survey, formerly the United States coast and geodetic survey, for defining and stating the geographic positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth within this state is hereafter to be known and designated as the ‘Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983.’“(b) The system of plane coordinates which was established in 1927 by the United States coast and geodetic survey for defining and stating the positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth within this state is hereafter to be known and designated as the ‘Tennessee Coordinate System of 1927.’”; added present (c) and redesignated former (c) and (d) as present (d) and (e), respectively; in present (d), substituted “this state” for “the state” and substituted “National Geodetic Survey” for “national ocean survey” at the end; and, in present (e), substituted “After December 31, 2022, the ‘Tennessee State Plane Coordinate System’ is” for “After December 31, 1992, the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983 shall be” at the beginning of the first sentence, and, in the last sentence, substituted “Any use prior to December 21, 2022” for “Any computer software designed prior to such date” and inserted “or the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 213, § 7. April 23, 2019.

Cross-References. County meridian lines, §§8-12-110 —8-12-114.

66-6-102. Coordinates used.

The plane coordinate values for a point on the earth's surface, used to express the geographic position or location of such point, shall consist of two (2) distances expressed in United States survey feet and decimals of a foot when using the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1927, expressed in either United States survey feet and decimals of a foot or meters and decimals of a meter when using the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983, and expressed in either United States survey feet and decimals of a foot or meters and decimals of a meter when using the Tennessee State Plane Coordinate System. When the values are expressed in United States survey feet, they shall be used as the standard foot for the Tennessee State Plane Coordinate System. One of these distances, to be known as the “East X-coordinate,” shall give the distance east of the Y axis; the other, to be known as the “North Y-coordinate,” shall give the distance north of the X axis. The Y axis of any zone shall be parallel with the central meridian of that zone. The X axis of any zone shall be at right angles to the central meridian of that zone.

Acts 1991, ch. 42, § 3; 2019, ch. 213, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§66-6-101 —66-6-107 (Acts 1947, ch. 179, §§ 1-6); C. Supp. 1950, §§ 1034.17-1034.22 (Williams, §§ 630.35-630.40), T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-601 — 64-607), concerning the Tennessee system of coordinates, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 42, § 8.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote the section which read: “The plane coordinate values for a point on the earth's surface, used to express the geographic position or location of such point, shall consist of two (2) distances expressed in United States survey feet and decimals of a foot when using the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1927, and expressed in meters and decimals of a meter when using the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983. Coordinate values may also be expressed in United States survey feet and decimals of a foot for the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983 as specified in §66-6-103(c). One (1) of these distances, to be known as the ‘x-coordinate,’ shall give the position in an east-and-west direction; the other, to be known as the ‘y-coordinate,’ shall give the position in a north-and-south direction. These coordinates shall be made to depend upon and conform to plane rectangular coordinate values for certain monumented points of the North American horizontal geodetic control network as published by the national ocean survey/national geodetic survey, formerly the United States coast and geodetic survey, or its successors, and whose plane coordinates have been computed on the systems defined in this chapter. Such monumented points of the North American horizontal geodetic control network shall be those existing or newly established in conformity with the standards of accuracy for first or second order geodetic surveying as prepared and published by the federal geodetic control committee (FGCC) of the United States department of commerce.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 213, § 7. April 23, 2019.

66-6-103. Technical definitions of systems.

For purposes of more precisely defining the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1927, the following definition by the United States coast and geodetic survey, now the national ocean survey/national geodetic survey, is adopted:

The “Tennessee Coordinate System of 1927” is a Lambert conformal conic projection of the Clarke spheroid of 1866, having standard parallels at north latitudes 35° 15' and 36° 25', along which parallels the scale shall be exact. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 86° 00' west of Greenwich and the parallel 34° 40' north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x (easting) = two million feet (2,000,000') and y (northing) = one hundred thousand feet (100,000').

For purposes of more precisely defining the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983, the following definition by the national ocean survey/national geodetic survey is adopted:

The “Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983” is Lambert conformal conic projection of the North American Datum of 1983, having standard parallels at north latitudes 35° 15' and 36° 25', along which parallels the scale shall be exact. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 86° 00' west of Greenwich and the parallel 34° 20' north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x (easting) = six hundred thousand meters (600,000 m.) and y (northing) = zero meters (0 m.).

The definition of the “U.S. Survey Foot” is exactly 1,200/3,937 meters.

Acts 1991, ch. 42, § 4; 2010, ch. 1139, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§66-6-101 —66-6-107 (Acts 1947, ch. 179, §§ 1-6); C. Supp. 1950, §§ 1034.17-1034.22 (Williams, §§ 630.35-630.40), T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-601 — 64-607), concerning the Tennessee system of coordinates, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 42, § 8.

66-6-104. Proximity to horizontal control monuments required for use of coordinates.

Unless established by Global Navigation Satellite Systems (GNSS) methods, no coordinates based on the systems of plane coordinates defined in this chapter, purporting to define the position of a point on a land boundary, shall be presented to be recorded in any public land records or deed records unless such point is within ten kilometers (10 km) of a horizontal control monument existing or newly established in conformity with the standards of accuracy for first or second order geodetic surveying as prepared and published by the federal geodetic control committee of the United States department of commerce. Standards of the federal geodetic control committee or its successor in force on the date of such survey shall apply. The accuracy limitations described in this section may be modified by any governmental agency to meet local conditions.

Acts 1991, ch. 42, § 5; 2019, ch. 213, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§66-6-101 —66-6-107 (Acts 1947, ch. 179, §§ 1-6); C. Supp. 1950, §§ 1034.17-1034.22 (Williams, §§ 630.35-630.40), T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-601 — 64-607), concerning the Tennessee system of coordinates, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 42, § 8.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in the first sentence, added “Unless established by Global Navigation Satellite Systems (GNSS) methods,” at the beginning, substituted “the systems of plane coordinates defined in this chapter,” for “either Tennessee coordinate system”, and substituted “ten kilometers (10 km)” for “five kilometers (5 km)”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 213, § 7. April 23, 2019.

66-6-105. Description of location of survey stations or land boundary corners — Reliance on system not required.

For purposes of describing the location of any survey station or land boundary corner in this state, it is considered a complete, legal, and satisfactory description of such location to give the position of such survey station or land boundary corner on any system of plane coordinates defined in this chapter; provided, that any person choosing to use a system of plane coordinates to describe any such survey station or land boundary after December 31, 1992, shall use the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983 and after December 31, 2022, shall use the Tennessee State Plane Coordinate System.

Nothing contained in this chapter requires a purchaser or mortgagee of real property to rely wholly on a property description, any part of which depends exclusively upon any Tennessee coordinate system.

Acts 1991, ch. 42, § 6; 2019, ch. 213, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§66-6-101 —66-6-107 (Acts 1947, ch. 179, §§ 1-6); C. Supp. 1950, §§ 1034.17-1034.22 (Williams, §§ 630.35-630.40), T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-601 — 64-607), concerning the Tennessee system of coordinates, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 42, § 8.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “it is considered” for “it shall be considered” and “any system” for “either system” and added “and after December 31, 2022, shall use the Tennessee State Plane Coordinate System” at the end; and, in (b), substituted “this chapter requires” for “this chapter shall require” and substituted “any Tennessee coordinate system” for “either Tennessee coordinate system” at the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 213, § 7. April 23, 2019.

66-6-106. Use of term system on documents — Designation of system used.

The terms Tennessee Coordinate System of 1927, Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983, or Tennessee State Plane Coordinate System must not be used on any map, report of survey, or other document, unless the coordinates contained within such document are based on the Tennessee coordinate system as defined in this chapter.

Any document containing coordinates based upon a system of plane coordinates defined in this chapter shall contain a statement that indicates whether the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1927, the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983, or the Tennessee State Plane Coordinate System was used.

This chapter must not be construed to prohibit the appropriate use of other datums and other geodetic reference networks.

Acts 1991, ch. 42, § 7; 2019, ch. 213, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§66-6-101 —66-6-107 (Acts 1947, ch. 179, §§ 1-6); C. Supp. 1950, §§ 1034.17-1034.22 (Williams, §§ 630.35-630.40), T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-601 — 64-607), concerning the Tennessee system of coordinates, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 42, § 8.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “The terms Tennessee Coordinate System of 1927, Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983, or Tennessee State Plane Coordinate System must not” for “The term ‘Tennessee Coordinate System of 1927’ or ‘Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983’ shall not” in (a); in (b), substituted “a system” for “either system” and substituted “, the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983, or the Tennessee State Plane Coordinate System” for “or the Tennessee Coordinate System of 1983” near the end; and added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 213, § 7. April 23, 2019.